Hawaii statutes.
§514A-123
Determination of insurance coverage. In the event of a dispute as to whether a claim shall be excluded
from mandatory arbitration under section 514A-121(b)(7), any party to an
arbitration may file a complaint for declaratory relief against the involved
insurer or insurers for a determination of whether insurance coverage is
unavailable due to the pursuit of action by arbitration. The complaint shall
be filed with the circuit court in the judicial circuit in which the
condominium is located. The insurer or insurers shall file an answer to the
complaint within twenty days of the date of service of the complaint and the
issue shall be disposed of by the circuit court at a hearing to be held at the
earliest available date; provided that the hearing shall not be held within
twenty days from the date of service of the complaint upon the insurer or
insurers. [L 2007, c 244, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next